Utah statutes.
23-13-8.   Private wildlife farms.
(1)  Any person may establish and maintain private wildlife farms for
propagating, rearing, and keeping furbearers or birds classified as protected
wildlife and may sell or dispose of wildlife reared upon such farms except
that disposal may not include release to the wild without first securing
written permission from the Wildlife Board. Before establishing such farm, a
person shall obtain written authorization from the Division of Wildlife
Resources in accordance with rules established by the Wildlife Board.  Any
wildlife which escapes from private wildlife farms becomes the property of the
state.
(2)  This section does not apply to private fur farms established and
maintained for rearing domesticated, privately owned mink or chinchilla which
were not acquired as wild animals from any state or country, nor does it
provide for the propagating, rearing, and keeping of any protected wildlife
other than those specified in this section.
